Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.122

Administration, oversight, or supervision of utility—Reimbursement from utility budget authorized.

Whenever any code city apportions a percentage of the city manager's, administrator's, or supervisor's time, or the time of other management or general government staff, for administration, oversight, or supervision of a utility operated by the city, or to provide services to the utility, the utility budget may identify such services and budget for reimbursement of the city's current expense fund for the value of such services.

[ 1991 c 152 s 3.]